Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2171.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7 of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 7. Powers and Duties of the Commission.--The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:* * *(r) To receive a complaint of any civil right or civil 1234567891011121314151617181920 liberty violation committed by an agent of United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement or an agent of a Federal, State or local law enforcement agency cooperating with United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement in the enforcement of immigration law. A complaint may be filed with the Commission by an individual who has been the subject of or witnessed a civil right or civil liberty violation committed in this Commonwealth by an agent of United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement or an agent of a Federal, State or local law enforcement agency cooperating with United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement in the enforcement of immigration law. A complaint of a civil right or civil liberty violation received under this subsection may be referred to the Attorney General or the county district attorney with jurisdiction over the county where the violation occurred.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2171PN2828 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516